California statutes. Water Code
Parcel 1.Beginning at the most southerly corner of Lot 919, First Addition to Newport Mesa Tract, as shown on a map recorded in book 8, page 61 of Miscellaneous Maps, Records of Orange County, California; thence North 29° 09´ 00″ West, 6399.66 feet, more or less, along the southwesterly line of said First Addition to Newport Mesa Tract to the most westerly corner of Lot 1304 of said First Addition to Newport Mesa Tract; thence, North 19° 16´ 00″ East 1066.56 feet, more or less, along the northwesterly line of said First Addition to Newport Mesa Tract to the northwest corner of said Tract, said corner being on the center line of Nineteenth Street as shown on a map of said First Addition to Newport Mesa Tract; thence, easterly along the center line of Nineteenth Street, to the intersection of the southerly prolongation of the westerly line of Lot 369 of Tract No. 1712, as shown on a map recorded in book 50, pages 32 to 36 of Miscellaneous Maps, Records of Orange County, California; thence, northerly along said westerly line and its southerly prolongation and along the boundary line of said Tract No. 1712 the following bearings and distances as shown on said map: North 0° 32´ 53″ West 140.00 feet, North 78° 38´ 39″ West 98.72 feet, North 4° 08´ 05″ West 166.43 feet, North 25° 13´ 11″ East 152.55 feet, South 83° 07´ 22″ East 200.44 feet, North 26° 33´ 54″ East 107.33 feet, North 11° 18´ 36″ West 280.45 feet, North 73° 10´ 43″ East 224.61 feet, South 25° 12´ 55″ East 255.80 feet, South 0° 32´ 53″ East 339.48 feet, North 89° 27´ 07″ East 328.59 feet, North 0° 32´ 53″ West 49.54 feet, North 22° 32´ 10″ West 379.16 feet, North 228.89 feet, North 89° 27´ 07″ East 329.49 feet, North 0° 32´ 10″ West 260.00 feet, North 89° 27´ 07″ East 240.00 feet, North 0° 32´ 10″ West 260.00 feet, North 89° 27´ 07″ East 298.00 feet, North 0° 32´ 10″ West 162.91 feet, North 78° 13´ 02″ West 322.87 feet, North 83° 43´ 22″ West 201.21 feet, South 14° 37´ 15″ West 285.24 feet, South 46° 07´ 56″ West 178.93 feet, South 75° 40´ 08″ West 261.40 feet, North 33° 39´ 12″ West 206.14 feet, North 46° 27´ 50″ East 315.20 feet, North 0° 32´ 10″ West 178.02 feet, South 89° 27´ 41″ West 620.00 feet, South 66° 52´ 26″ West 240.00 feet, North 78° 04´ 04″ West 61.08 feet, North 21° 56´ 42″ West 187.00 feet, North 19° 00´ 22″ East 190.38 feet, North 48° 14´ 42″ West 299.27 feet, North 354.12 feet to the southerly line of the Fairview Farms Tract, as shown on a map recorded in book 8, page 71 of Miscellaneous Maps, records of Orange County, California; thence, westerly along said southerly line to the northeasterly corner of Tract No. 3470, as shown on a map thereof recorded in Book 124, Pages 5 and 6 of Miscellaneous Maps, Records of Orange County, California; thence, South 0° 33´ 00″ East along the easterly line of said Tract No. 3470 and the southerly prolongation thereof, 2641.35 feet, to the westerly prolongation of the centerline of Nineteenth Street as shown on the aforementioned map of Fairview Farms; thence, South 89° 28´ 00″ West, along said westerly prolongation of the centerline of Nineteenth Street, 2503.19 feet, to the easterly line of the Santa Ana River, 300 feet in width, as described in a deed to the Newbert Protection District, recorded June 22, 1911 in Book 197, Page 300 of Official Records of Orange County, California; thence, North 13° 25´ 00″ East, along said easterly line of the Santa Ana River, 5441.38 feet, to the westerly prolongation of the northerly line of aforementioned Fairview Farms; thence, continuing northerly along said easterly line of the Santa Ana River, North 13° 25´ 00″ East, 5500.09 feet to a point on a line 50.00 feet northerly of, measured at right angles, and parallel to the centerline of Adams Avenue, as described in a deed to the County of Orange, recorded December 4, 1908 in Book 160, Page 180 of Official Records, Orange County, California; thence, North 89° 16´ 24″ East, 231.81 feet, along last mentioned parallel line to the easterly line of the Greenville-Banning Channel, as described in a deed to the Orange County Flood Control District, recorded in Book 4367, Pages 346 to 350, inclusive, of Official Records of said Orange County; thence, North 13° 11´ 54″ East, along said easterly line of aforementioned Greenville-Banning Channel, 767.56 feet, to the beginning of a tangent curve, concave easterly, having a radius of 22,538.30 feet; thence, northerly along said curve and said easterly line of the Greenville-Banning Channel, to its intersection with the southerly line of Gisler Avenue; thence, westerly along the southerly line of Gisler Avenue to the easterly line of the aforementioned Santa Ana River; thence, northerly along said easterly line of the Santa Ana River to the northerly line of MacArthur Boulevard 60 feet in width (formerly Talbert Avenue); thence, easterly along said northerly line and the easterly prolongation of said northerly line to a point 40.00 feet easterly of the centerline of Harbor Boulevard; thence, southerly along a line parallel with and 40 feet easterly of said centerline to the southerly line of Sunflower Avenue (formerly Huntzinger Avenue), 40 feet wide; thence, easterly along said southerly line to a point distant thereon 1262.80 feet from the centerline of Harbor Boulevard to an angle point in the existing boundary of the City of Costa Mesa as created by Parcel No. 2 of Resolution No. 71-30; thence, North 0° 46´ 51″ West, 40.00 feet to a point on a line parallel with and 20.00 feet northerly of said centerline of Sunflower Avenue; thence, North 89° 11´ 09″ East, along said parallel line a distance of 2289.31 feet, to a point on a line parallel with and 30.00 feet westerly of the centerline of Fairview Road; thence, North 0° 09´ 24″ East, along said parallel line a distance of 178.18 feet; thence, North 89° 26´ 11″ East, 812. 86 feet; thence, North 75° 50´ 45″ East, 46.30 feet to a point on a tangent curve concave southeasterly and having a radius of 1040.00 feet; thence, northeasterly along said curve through a central angle of 3° 50´ 51″ an arc distance of 69.84 feet, to a point, a radial line to said point bears North 10° 18´ 24″ West; thence, North 89° 26´ 11″ East, 226.07 feet; thence, north 89° 22´ 06″ East, 2083.69 feet to a point, said point being on a non-tangent curve concave southwesterly, having a radius of 1040.00 feet, a radial line to said point bears North 9° 06´ 41″ East; thence, southeasterly along said curve through a central angle of 6° 11´ 58″ an arc distance of 112.53 feet; thence, North 89° 22´ 06″ East, 1411.10 feet to a point on the centerline of Bear Street; thence, South 0° 22´ 08″ East, along said centerline of Bear Street, 772.35 feet to a point on a line parallel to and 12.00 feet northerly, measured at right angles from the centerline of Sunflower Avenue; thence, North 89° 17´ 10″ West, along said parallel line 2582.37 feet, more or less, to the West right-of-way line of the Santa Ana-Delhi Flood Control Channel as shown on Map No. F01-5, of Orange County Flood Control District; thence, North 0° 40´ 04″ West, 13.00 feet along said West right-of-way line, to a point on a line parallel to and 25.00 feet northerly, measured at right angles from the centerline of Sunflower Avenue; thence, North 89° 44´ 11″ East, 708.15 feet along last said parallel line to an angle point in said parallel line; thence, East 4003.48 feet along last said parallel line to a point, said point being the intersection of a line that is parallel with and 33.00 feet easterly from the centerline of Main Street as granted to the County of Orange by Deed recorded in Book 250, Page 73 of Official Records of Orange County, California, with a line that is parallel with and 25.00 feet northerly from the centerline of Sunflower Avenue; thence, South 0° 20´ 45″ East, 872.16 feet along a line parallel with and 33.00 feet easterly from said centerline of Main Street, to a point on the southeasterly line of Newport Avenue, 60.00 feet in width, as granted to the County of Orange by Deed recorded in Book 250, Page 73 of Official Records of Orange County, California; thence, southwesterly along said southeasterly line of Newport Avenue to a point on the northeasterly line of Lot 134, Block 7, Irvine’s Subdivision in the County of Orange, State of California, as shown on a map thereof, recorded in Book 1, Page 88 of Miscellaneous Maps, Records of Orange County, California; thence, along said northeasterly line, South 49° 21´ 19″ East, 1410.00 feet to a point in the centerline of Redhill Avenue, 100.00 feet in width, as granted to the County of Orange by Deed recorded in Book 7148, Page 205 of Official Records of said County; thence, along the centerline of said Redhill Avenue, South 40° 38´ 28″ West, 442.61 feet; thence, departing said centerline of Redhill Avenue, South 49° 22´ 15″ East, 55.00 feet; thence, North 43° 48´ 32″ East, 880.50 feet to the southwesterly right-of-way line of the San Diego Freeway; thence, South 85° 26´ 23″ East, 142.05 feet along said southwesterly right-of-way line to the beginning of a tangent curve, concave southwesterly and having a radius of 1700.00 feet; thence, southeasterly along said curve through a central angle of 24° 03´ 45″, 713.95 feet to a point of tangency; thence, South 61° 22´ 38″ East, 43.48 feet; thence, South 61° 11´ 45″ East, 2376.41 feet, more or less, along said right-of-way line to an intersection with the northwesterly right-of-way line of MacArthur Boulevard, 100 feet wide, as described in the Deed to the County of Orange recorded January 10, 1963, in Book 6389, Page 641, of Official Records of said County; thence, South 29° 15´ 38″ West, 4142.58 feet along said right-of-way line and the easterly line of that certain land described as Parcel Nos. G.A. 1121-38 and 38.1 in the Deed to the County of Orange, California, recorded March 19, 1964, in Book 6968, Page 337, of Official Records of said County, to the beginning of a tangent curve, concave southeasterly and having a radius of 1250.00 feet; thence, southwesterly 351.89 feet along said curve through a central angle of 16° 07´ 46″ to a tangent line; thence, South 13° 07´ 52″ West, 64.51 feet, more or less, along said tangent line to an intersection with a non-tangent curve, to which a radial bears North 4° 38´ 46″ West, concave southerly and having a radius of 1240.00 feet, said non-tangent curve being the northerly right-of-way line of a curve connecting realigned Acacia Street with Paularino Avenue as described in the Deed to the County of Orange, California, recorded January 2, 1963 in Book 6380, Page 88 of Official Records of said County; thence, westerly and southwesterly 809.79 feet, more or less, along said curve and its southwesterly prolongation through a central angle of 37° 25´ 03″ to an intersection with a non-tangent line, to which a radial bears North 42° 03´ 49″ West, said non-tangent line being the northwesterly line of Campus Drive (formerly Acacia Street), 60.00 feet wide, described as Parcel 2 in the Deed to the County of Orange, California, recorded July 15, 1940 in Book 1055, Page 115 of Official Records of said County; thence, South 40° 39´ 17″ West, 4219.23 feet, more or less, along said northwesterly line and the northwesterly extension of said northwesterly line to a point on the centerline of Palisades Road, said point also being on the southwesterly line of Lot 143, Block 6 of the aforementioned Irvine’s Subdivision; thence, northwesterly along said centerline of Palisades Road to the centerline intersection of Santa Ana Avenue and Palisades Road as shown on a Parcel Map recorded in Book 7, Page 44 of Parcel Maps, Records of Orange County, California; thence, North 50° 11´ 57″ West, along said centerline of Palisades Road, 190.00 feet, to the northeasterly prolongation of the northwesterly line of Parcel 1, as shown on said Parcel Map; thence, South 39° 48´ 22″ West, 190.00 feet along the northwesterly boundary line of Parcel 1, as shown on said Parcel Map; thence, South 50° 11´ 57″ East, 190.00 feet along the southwesterly boundary line of Parcel 1, as shown on said Parcel Map to a point on the centerline of Santa Ana Avenue; thence, South 39° 48´ 22″ West, 272.13 feet along said centerline to the easterly line of the Santa Ana Delhi Channel easement; thence, leaving said centerline, along said easterly easement line North 70° 19´ 08″ West, 898.31 feet to the beginning of a tangent curve, concave northeasterly, having a radius of 100.00 feet; thence, northwesterly and northerly along said curve, through a central angle of 53° 17´ 00″ an arc distance of 93.00 feet; thence, continuing along said easement line North 12° 57´ 52″ East, 400. 48 feet to a point on the centerline of Palisades Road; thence, northwesterly along said centerline as granted to the County of Orange by Deed recorded in Book 2352, Page 389 of Official Records of Orange County, California, to a point on the southeasterly line of Newport Avenue, 60.00 feet in width, as granted to the County of Orange by Deed recorded in Book 250, Page 73 of Official Records of Orange County; thence, southwesterly along said southeasterly line of Newport Avenue to the centerline of 23rd Street; thence, southeasterly along the centerline of 23rd Street to the centerline of Tustin Avenue; thence, southwesterly along the centerline of Tustin Avenue to the centerline of 22nd Street; thence, southeasterly along the centerline of 22nd Street to the centerline of Irvine Avenue; thence, southwesterly along the centerline of Irvine Avenue to the centerline of 16th Street; thence, northwesterly along the centerline of 16th Street to the centerline of Tustin Avenue; thence, southwesterly along the centerline of Tustin Avenue to the centerline of 15th Street; thence, northwesterly along the centerline of 15th Street to the easterly line of a 100 foot right-of-way granted to the Santa Ana Railroad, a Corporation, by Deed dated October 10, 1889 and recorded in Book 10, Page 117, of Deeds, Records of said Orange County, California; thence, southwesterly along said easterly line to the westerly prolongation of the northerly line of Lot 5 of Tract No. 1136, as shown on a map recorded in Book 37, Pages 18 and 19 of Miscellaneous Maps of said Orange County, California; thence, easterly along said westerly prolongation of the northerly line of said Lot 5 to the easterly line of State Highway, also known as County Highway; thence, southerly along said easterly line to the southerly line of State Highway 1 (ORA 60-A), 100.00 feet in width; thence, westerly along said southerly line to the northwesterly line of Irvine’s Subdivision, as shown on a map thereof recorded in Book 1, Page 88, of Miscellaneous Maps of said Orange County, California; thence, northeasterly along said northwesterly line to the southeasterly prolongation of the southwesterly line of Lot 919 of said First Addition to the Newport Mesa Tract; thence, northwesterly to the Point of Beginning.

Excepting therefrom all that certain real property situated in the County of Orange, State of California, owned by Hoag Memorial Hospital-Presbyterian, a corporation, described as:

A portion of Lot 172 Block 1, Lot 169 Block 2, and Lot 170 Block 2, of Irvine Subdivision, as per map recorded in Book 1, Page 88, Miscellaneous Maps, records of Orange County, California, and more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at the point of intersection of the northerly line of the West Ramp of the California State Highway described as second in the Deed recorded June 12th, 1931, in Book 489, Page 67 of Official Records, with the northwesterly line of the 60 foot right-of-way of the California State Highway, described in the Deed recorded June 30th, 1934, in Book 683, Page 248 of Official Records; thence northeasterly along the northwesterly line of said 60 foot right-of-way, a distance of 1371.39 feet; thence West 1019.26 feet to a point, said point being distant 518.21 feet South 60° 20´ 54″ East from the most westerly corner of Lot One Hundred Sixty-nine in Block Two of Irvine Subdivision, as shown on a map recorded in Book 1, Page 88 of Miscellaneous Maps, records of Orange County, California; thence South 10° 30´ 46″ East 190.75 feet; thence in a southeasterly direction along a curve concave to the northeast, having a radius of 1000 feet and through an angle of 12° 50´ 04″ a distance of 224 feet; thence South 23° 20´ 50″ East 253.42 feet; thence southeasterly along a curve concave to the northeast having a radius of 409.51 feet through an angle of 15° 41´ 02″ a distance of 112.10 feet; thence southeasterly along a reversed curve concave to the southwest having a radius of 514.46 feet through an angle of 12° 30´ 43″ a distance of 112.34 feet; thence South 26° 31´ 09″ East 584.24 feet to a point in a curve of the northwesterly line of said West Ramp of the California State Highway as described in said Deed recorded in Book 489, Page 67 of Official Records, said curve being concave to the South and having a radius of 450 feet, a line radial to curve at this point, bears North 12° 47´ 01″ West; thence easterly along said curve through an angle of 19° 51´ 06″ a distance of 155.91 feet to the point of beginning. The above 20 acre described parcel is shown on a Record of Survey, filed in Book 15, Page 30, Record of Surveys, Orange County, California.

Also, excepting therefrom that portion of Lot 5, Block “E”, and Lot 6, Block “E” of the Berry Tract as shown on a map thereof, recorded in Book 30, Page 74 of Miscellaneous Records of Los Angeles County, California, described as follows:

Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of Bear Street and the centerline of Paularino Avenue as shown on Tract Map 4894, Miscellaneous Map, Book 172, Pages 31 and 32; thence, South 89° 49´ 34″ East along the centerline of Paularino Avenue a distance of 528.21 feet, more or less, to a point, said point being the southwest corner of Tract 4894; thence, South 0° 29´ 25″ West a distance of 33.00 feet to a point on the southerly line of Paularino Avenue, 66 feet wide, said point being the northwest corner of Lot 6, Block “E” of said Berry Tract; thence, South 89° 49´ 35″ East along the southerly line of Paularino Avenue, said line being contiguous with the northerly line of Lot 6, Block “E” of said Berry Tract, a distance of 105.60 feet, more or less, to the True Point of Beginning; thence, continuing South 89° 49´ 35″ East along said southerly line of Paularino Avenue a distance of 209.32 feet, more or less; thence, departing from said southerly line of Paularino Avenue, parallel with the East line of said Lot 6, South 0° 12´ 08″ West, a distance of 379.50 feet, more or less, to a point distant 412.50 feet, measured at right angles, northerly of the centerline of Baker Street; thence, parallel with said centerline of Baker Street, South 89° 48´ 12″ East, a distance of 86.20 feet; thence, parallel with the East line of said Lot 6, North 0° 12´ 08″ East, a distance of 379.53 feet, more or less, to the southerly line of said Paularino Avenue; thence, South 89° 49´ 35″ East along said southerly line a distance of 651.10 feet, more or less, to a point distant thereon 3.80 feet westerly of the northeast corner of Lot 5, Block “E” of said Berry Tract; thence, southerly parallel to the East line of said Lot 5 to a point, said point being 412.50 feet northerly of the centerline of Baker Street, 80.00 feet wide; thence, North 89° 48´ 15″ West along a line parallel to said centerline of Baker Street 101.80 feet; thence, South 0° 14´ 35″ West along a line parallel to the easterly line of Lot 5, of said Block “E”, Berry Tract, to the northerly line of said Baker Street, a distance of 372.50 feet; thence, westerly along said northerly line to a point on the westerly line of aforementioned Lot 6, Berry Tract; thence, northerly along said westerly line to a point, said point being 379.50 feet, more or less, southerly of the southerly line of aforementioned Paularino Avenue; thence, South 89° 49´ 35″ East along a line parallel to the said southerly line, a distance of 105.60 feet; thence, North 0° 29´ 25″ East, 379.50 feet, more or less, to the True Point of Beginning.

Parcel 2.Beginning at a point on the center line of Santa Isabel Avenue, distant thereon North 50° 11´ 45″ West, 30.00 feet from the southwesterly prolongation of the southeasterly line of Lot 114, Tract No. 300 as shown on a map thereof, recorded in Book 14, Pages 11 and 12 of Miscellaneous Maps, Records of Orange County, California; thence, South 39° 49´ 25″ West, along a line 30.00 feet northwesterly of, measured at right angles, and parallel with the southeasterly line of Lot 105, Tract No. 300, 157.00 feet; thence, North 50° 11´ 45″ West, 300.00 feet; thence, North 39° 49´ 25″ East, 157.00 feet, to the centerline of said Santa Isabel Avenue; thence, North 50° 11´ 45″ West, 660.00 feet to the southwesterly prolongation of the northwesterly line of the southeasterly 330 feet of Lot 113 of said Tract No. 300; thence, North 39° 48´ 45″ East, along said southwesterly prolongation and said northwesterly line of the southeasterly 330 feet of Lot 113, Tract No. 300 and the northwesterly line of the southeasterly 330 feet of Lot 116 of said Tract No. 300, 1320.00 feet, to the centerline of Monte Vista Avenue, 60.00 feet in width as shown on said map of Tract No. 300; thence, South 50° 11´ 45″ East along said centerline of Monte Vista Avenue, 594.00 feet, to the northeasterly prolongation of the southeasterly line of the northwesterly half of the southeasterly 132 feet of the northwesterly 330 feet of Lot 115, of said Tract No. 300; thence, South 39° 48´ 45″ West along last mentioned northeasterly prolongation and last mentioned southeasterly line, 330 feet to the northeasterly line of the southwesterly 330 feet of the southeasterly 66 feet, of the northwesterly 330 feet of said Lot 115, Tract No. 300; thence, South 50° 11´ 45″ East along last mentioned northeasterly line, 66.00 feet to the southeasterly line of said southwesterly 330 feet of the southeasterly 66 feet, of the northwesterly 330 feet of Lot 115; thence, South 39° 48´ 45″ West, along last mentioned southeasterly line and the southeasterly line of the northwesterly 330 feet of Lot 114 of said Tract No. 300, 462.00 feet to the northwesterly line of the southwesterly 132 feet of the northeasterly 264 feet of the southeasterly one-half of said Lot 114, Tract No. 300; thence, South 50° 11´ 45″ East along last mentioned northeasterly line, 300.00 feet to a line 30 feet northwesterly of, measured at right angles, and parallel with the southeasterly line of said Lot 114, Tract No. 300; thence, South 39° 48´ 45″ West, along said parallel line, 528.00 feet to the Point of Beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

33216.

The name of the new district which succeeds the preceding districts and the city water system is “Costa Mesa County Water District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33217.

The new district is a public agency of the State and shall in all respects be operated, managed and governed as provided by law for county water districts generally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 57.)
-------------------------------------------

33218.

The Newport Heights Irrigation District, Fairview County Water District, the Newport Mesa County Water District, and the Newport Mesa Irrigation District are hereby dissolved and for all purposes shall cease to exist as herein provided. The Costa Mesa County Water District shall and does hereby succeed to all the properties and rights of said districts, and the water system, facilities, and appurtenances of the City of Costa Mesa.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33219.

The dissolution of the Fairview County Water District, the Newport Mesa County Water District, the Newport Heights Irrigation District, and the Newport Mesa Irrigation District, and their merger into the Costa Mesa County Water District, shall occur and be considered completed for all purposes on the first day of the second month following the sixty-first day after the effective date of this part, unless there has been filed with any of the districts or the City of Costa Mesa a petition signed by at least 5 percent of the registered voters of the area comprising all of the districts and the City of Costa Mesa requesting that an election be held for the purpose of approving or disapproving the dissolution, merger and creation of the new district by popular vote. If such petition is filed and found to be valid, the election shall be held as quickly as possible and pursuant to the general provisions for holding elections as provided for county water districts, beginning with Section 30700 of the Water Code. The certification of the results of the election, if held, shall determine whether the dissolution, merger and creation of the new Costa Mesa County Water District has been accomplished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33220.

The boards of directors of the Newport Heights Irrigation District, Fairview County Water District, the Newport Mesa County Water District, and the city council of the City of Costa Mesa, may adopt, any time prior to the first day of the second month following the sixty-first day after this part becomes effective, resolutions approving the dissolution of their districts and merger into the Costa Mesa County Water District pursuant to the provisions of this part. The failure of any of these districts or the city to adopt such a resolution shall not prevent the dissolution, merger and creation of the Costa Mesa County Water District, but shall only prevent the dissolution, merger and transfer of such district or city system as provided in this part. The territory of any district or city not adopting such resolution shall be excluded from Section 33215 hereof and shall not be part of the Costa Mesa County Water District as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33221.

As the Newport Mesa Irrigation District has been inactive for a number of years by reason of the formation of an overlapping district known as the Newport Mesa County Water District, action by its directors, if any, shall not be necessary for approval of this part. The Newport Mesa Irrigation District is hereby dissolved and any property of the Newport Mesa Irrigation District not already transferred to the Newport Mesa County Water District is hereby transferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33222.

On the first day of the second month following the sixty-first day after the effective date of this part, and if the districts and the city have adopted the resolutions approving this part as herein provided, and if no petition bearing at least 5 percent of the signatures of the registered voters of the area in the districts and the city has been filed requesting an election, the dissolution of the named districts and their merger into and the formation of the new Costa Mesa County Water District shall occur without further action by any of the districts or the city. All of the facilities, properties, assets and liabilities of all the districts are hereby transferred on such date to the Costa Mesa County Water District. The water system and its appurtenances of the City of Costa Mesa are, pursuant to the city’s resolution approving same, transferred as of that date to the Costa Mesa County Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33223.

The boards of directors of the Newport Heights Irrigation District, Fairview County Water District, and Newport Mesa County Water District, and the City Council of the City of Costa Mesa, shall cause to be recorded with the Recorder of Orange County a certified copy of their resolutions approving the dissolution, merger and creation of the Costa Mesa County Water District as provided in this part. Said resolutions for recording shall include the boundary description of the district or city adopting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33224.

Any assessments levied by or on behalf of the districts, or any bills or statements rendered by or on behalf of the districts, being dissolved and merged into the new Costa Mesa County Water District shall continue to be a debt or obligation of the person or property against whom levied, assessed or rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Operation of New District [33240. - 33249.]

33240.

Except as in this part expressly provided, the new Costa Mesa County Water District shall be in all respects operated, managed and governed, its directors and officers shall be elected or appointed, and its revenue shall be raised and expended, as provided by law for county water districts generally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33241.

Any and all actions and proceedings pending by or against any of the districts dissolved hereby at the time of their dissolution and merger into the new district may be prosecuted to final judgment for or against said districts, or the new Costa Mesa County Water District may be substituted as a party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33242.

After the effective date of the dissolution and merger of the districts into the new Costa Mesa County Water District, no action or proceeding shall be brought for or against the dissolved and merged districts or their directors or officers or employees, but shall be prosecuted by or against the Costa Mesa County Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33243.

All outstanding bonded and other indebtednesses of the dissolved and merged districts are hereby assumed by the Costa Mesa County Water District, and all bondholders and creditors of such districts may enforce any rights they may have against the Costa Mesa County Water District in like manner as if the districts had not been dissolved and merged into the Costa Mesa County Water District. All property subject to taxation or assessment for the payment of the principal of or interest on any such outstanding bonded and other indebtedness shall, until such principal and interest is paid or provision is made for the payment thereof, continue to be subject to such taxation or assessment as fully as though said districts had not been merged or dissolved, and all provisions of law which could have been used against the legislative bodies and officers of the merged or dissolved districts to compel the levy and collection of such taxes or assessments had the merger or dissolution not occurred can be used against the board of directors and officers of the Costa Mesa County Water District. As the City of Costa Mesa has no present bonded indebtedness, the new Costa Mesa County Water District is not assuming any present or future indebtedness of the City of Costa Mesa.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33244.

Upon the dissolution of the named districts, their merger into the Costa Mesa County Water District, and the transfer of the water system by the City of Costa Mesa to the Costa Mesa County Water District as in this part provided, there shall be transferred to the General Fund of the Costa Mesa County Water District a sum equal to three dollars ($3) for each connected consumer by each of the districts and the City of Costa Mesa. All other funds of the district shall be transferred to special accounts for the payment of bond principal and interest of the respective assessment districts as provided in this part. Any surplus remaining after the payment of all bonded indebtedness or after setting aside sufficient funds to pay all bonded indebtedness shall remain in the special fund for the benefit of the territory of the district from which the funds were collected, and shall be used from time to time, until expended, for capital improvements within such territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33245.

The boards of directors of the Newport Heights Irrigation District, the Fairview County Water District, and the Newport Mesa County Water District, and the city council of the City of Costa Mesa, shall, on or before the first day of the first month following the sixty-first day after this part becomes effective, appoint by resolution a director to serve as a director of the Costa Mesa County Water District. The four directors so appointed shall, within 60 days thereafter, appoint the fifth director. If they for any reason should fail to appoint such a director within the time allowed, the board of supervisors of the County of Orange shall appoint such director. If any of the districts or the city fail to appoint a director as herein provided, the directors who are appointed as herein provided shall consider such office vacant and make an appointment therefor. The directors so appointed shall proceed as provided in Water Code Sections 30520 and following, to organize the board, elect officers, and proceed to govern the affairs of the Costa Mesa County Water District. Any director so appointed must qualify as provided by county water district law, and the first directors shall classify themselves by lot as provided in Water Code Section 30501.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33246.

The board of directors of the Costa Mesa County Water District shall, as soon as possible after the formation of the district, cause an appraisal to be made of all operating (other than pipelines, wells, reservoirs and appurtenances) and non-operating assets acquired from each district and the city. The non-operating assets shall be sold as soon as practicable and the proceeds therefrom credited to the district or city from which received. The operating assets necessary for the proper functioning of the integrated system shall be retained and all surplus operating property shall be sold and the proceeds therefrom credited to the agency from which received. It is the intention of the Legislature that the Costa Mesa County Water District equalize as much as reasonably possible the contribution of retained operating property (other than pipelines, wells, reservoirs and appurtenances) by each of the agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33247.

The Board of Directors of the Costa Mesa County Water District shall, by January 1, 1977, adopt a resolution dividing the Costa Mesa County Water District into five divisions as nearly equal in population as practicable for the purpose of electing directors thereafter by divisions, as provided in Article 1 (commencing at Section 30730) of Chapter 2, Part 4, Division 12 of the Water Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

33248.

The districts and the city shall, pursuant to this part, execute any and all documents necessary to complete the transfer of assets as herein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33249.

The Board of Directors of the Costa Mesa County Water District shall enforce the same or similar provisions as Ordinance No. 122 of the City of Costa Mesa, respecting extension of water mains and costs thereof and the requirement of annexation to the City of Costa Mesa for water service in the area formerly served by the city system and the contiguous area northerly and easterly thereof, until the full amount of the funds advanced or hereafter advanced by the city for mainline extension, reservoir or well purposes has been collected and refunded to the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. REPEALS [33900. - 33901.]

33900.

The following acts are hereby repealed:
YearCh. Pg. 
1913: 592: 1049
1937: 469: 1410

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33901.

The repeals effected by this part shall not be construed to deprive any district or any person or other entity of any substantial right which would have existed or hereafter exist had such repeals not been effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13. CALIFORNIA WATER DISTRICTS [34000. - 38501.]



PART 1. INTRODUCTORY PROVISIONS [34000. - 34055.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title [34000. - 34000.]

34000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Water District Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [34010. - 34036.]

34010.

Unless the context otherwise requires the provisions of this chapter shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34011.

The definition of a word applies to any of its variants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34012.

“Include” except when used in relation to the inclusion of land into a district does not necessarily exclude matters not enumerated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34013.

“District” except as otherwise provided means a water district formed pursuant to the California Water District Act or to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34014.

“Land” means the solid material of the earth whatever may be the ingredients of which it is composed, whether soil, rock, or other substance, but there shall not be included in the meaning of land improvements thereon or rights and privileges appertaining to minerals, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances underlying the surface thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2041.)
-------------------------------------------

34015.

“Principal county” means the county in which the greatest portion of the area of the land is situated at the time of the filing of the petition for formation of the district or to which district records are transferred pursuant to Chapter 6 of Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34016.

“Affected county” means any county in which land is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34017.

“Office” means the office for the district selected by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34018.

Except as otherwise provided, “board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34019.

“Elective officers,” irrespective of the method of selection in any instance, (1) are the members of the board and (2) may be an assessor and a tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 206.)
-------------------------------------------

34020.

“President” means the president of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

34021.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the district.
